Washington statutes.
RCW 39.10.470

Public inspection of certain records—Protection of trade secrets—Protection of documents submitted.

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, all proceedings, records, contracts, and other public records relating to alternative public works transactions under this chapter shall be open to the inspection of any interested person, firm, or corporation in accordance with chapter 42.56 RCW.

(2) Trade secrets, as defined in RCW 19.108.010, or other proprietary information submitted by a bidder, offeror, or contractor in connection with an alternative public works transaction under this chapter shall not be subject to chapter 42.56 RCW if the bidder, offeror, or contractor specifically states in writing the reasons why protection is necessary, and identifies the data or materials to be protected.

(3) All documents related to a procurement under RCW 39.10.330 are exempt from disclosure until the notification of the highest scoring finalist is made in accordance with RCW 39.10.330(6) or the selection process is terminated, except as expressly required under RCW 39.10.330(3).

[ 2019 c 212 s 11; 2014 c 19 s 2; 2005 c 274 s 275; 1994 c 132 s 10. Formerly RCW 39.10.100.]

NOTES:

Sunset Act application: See note following chapter digest.